Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
UNIVERSITY PERSONNEL

A. Positions and Compensation

[§304A-1001] Exempt personnel.
Personnel of the university not subject to chapter 76 shall be under the
direction of the president of the University of Hawaii. The board of regents
shall appoint deans, directors, members of the faculty, and other employees as
may be required to carry out the purposes of the institution, prescribe their
salaries and terms of service when the salaries and terms of service are not
specifically fixed by legislative enactment, and make and enforce rules
governing sabbatical and professional improvement leaves with or without pay,
consistent with the practice of similar institutions in the United States and
notwithstanding the laws of the State relating to leaves of absence of the
officers and employees of the State. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next